Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Wyoming Drug Identification Act

§ 33-24-201.
Short Title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Drug Identification Act”.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 250, § 1.

§ 33-24-202.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Code imprint” means a series of letters or numbers assigned by the manufacturer or distributor to a specific drug, or marks or monograms unique to the manufacturer or distributor of the drug, or both;

“Dangerous substance” means any drug defined under W.S.

33-24-125

;

“Distributor” means a person who distributes for resale a drug in solid dosage form under his own label even though he is not the actual manufacturer of the drug;

“Solid dosage form” means capsules or tablets intended for oral use;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 250, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(v), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

33-24-201

through

33-24-204

."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-24-203.
Code imprint required for the manufacture and distribution of dangerous substances; listing of substances with board of pharmacy; exceptions; exemptions.

No dangerous substance in solid dosage form shall be manufactured or distributed in this state unless it is clearly marked or imprinted with a code imprint identifying the drug and the manufacturer or distributor of the drug.

All manufacturers and distributors of dangerous substances in solid dosage form shall provide upon request to the Wyoming board of pharmacy a listing of all dangerous substances identifying by code imprint the manufacturer and the specific type of drug. The listing shall at all times be kept current by all manufacturers and distributors subject to this article.

This article shall not apply to nonnarcotic, nonprescription, prepackaged medicinal preparations contained in distinctive and original unbroken containers, when the medicinal preparations are identified by and sold under a trade name of the manufacturer or primary distributor and are sold or offered for sale to the general public, if the articles meet the requirements of state and federal food, drug and cosmetic laws.

The Wyoming board of pharmacy may grant exemptions from the requirements of this article upon application by any drug manufacturer or distributor showing size, physical characteristics or other unique characteristics which render the application of a code imprint to a drug subject to this article impractical or impossible. Any exemption granted by the board shall be included by the manufacturer or distributor in the listing required by subsection (b) of this section, describing the physical characteristics and type of drug to which the exemption applies.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 250, § 1.

§ 33-24-204.
Violations; seizure by the board of pharmacy.

All dangerous substances in solid dosage form that are possessed, distributed, sold or offered for sale in violation of the provisions of this article are deemed contraband and shall be seized by the Wyoming board of pharmacy and summarily forfeited to the state.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 250, § 1.